Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1362
Provisional license.

A provisional license may be issued to a crematory authority that substantially complies with requirements for licensure under the Cremation of Human Remains Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. Such provisional license shall be valid for a period of up to one year, shall not be renewed, and may be converted to a regular license upon a showing that the crematory authority fully complies with the requirements for licensure under the act and rules and regulations.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 8.